en: deepwater redfish
de: Tiefenrotbarsch
es: gallineta nórdica, gallineta oceánica
fa: صخره‌ماهی ژرف‌زی
fi: pohjolanpunasimppu
fo: Trantkongafiskur
fr: dorade sébaste, Dorade-sébaste
hr: dubokovodna crvena riba
is: Djúpkarfi
it: scorfano di acque profonde
la: Sebastes mentella
nb: Snabeluer
nl: Diepzeeroodbaars
sv: Djuphavskungsfisk
zh: 尖吻平鮋

en: Raw golden redfish
fr: Grand sébaste cru, Dorade sébaste cru, Daurade sébaste cru
it: pesce rosso dorato crudo

en: European conger
ar: قنجر أوروبي
bg: европейска морска змиорка
br: Silienn-vor
ca: congre
co: Groncu
cs: Úhořovec mořský
cy: Congren
de: Meeraal
el: Μουγγρί
eo: Kongro
es: congrio
eu: Itsas aingira
fa: مارماهی بزرگ اروپایی
fi: Meriankerias
fr: congre
gl: congro
he: קונגר אירופי
hr: ugor
io: Kongro
it: Grongo
ja: ヨーロッパアナゴ
kg: Musikimbila
la: Conger conger
lt: Jūrinis ungurys
nb: Havål
nl: zeepaling, Kongeraal
nn: Havål
pl: Konger
pt: Safio
ru: Конгер
sh: Ugor
sl: Gruj
sr: Угор
sv: Havsål
tr: Mığrı
uk: Морський вугор звичайний
zh: 歐洲康吉鰻

en: cusk
la: Brosme brosme

en: garfish, garpike
de: Hornhecht, Belone belone
es: aguja
hr: garfish
it: aguglia
la: belone belone

en: perch
ca: perca
de: Barsch
es: perca
fr: perche
hr: smuđ
it: persico
nl: baars

en: nile perch
ar: بياض نيلي
az: Nil xanısı
bg: нилски костур
br: Perch an Nil
ca: perca del Nil
cs: robalo nilský
de: Nilbarsch, Viktoriabarsch
eo: Nila perko
es: perca del nilo
fa: ماهی لوتی نیل
fi: Niilinahven
fr: Perche du Nil
he: נסיכת הנילוס
hr: nilski grgeč
hu: Nílusi sügér
it: Persico del Nilo
ja: ナイルパーチ
ko: 나일농어
la: Lates Niloticus
lt: Didysis nilinis ešerys
nb: nilabbor
nl: Nijlbaars
pl: Okoń nilowy
pt: perca do Nilo
ru: Нильский окунь
sv: Nilabborre
th: ปลากะพงแม่น้ำไนล์
uk: Окунь нільський
vi: Cá rô sông Nile
zh: 尼羅尖吻鱸

en: raw nile perch
fr: perche du Nil crue
it: persico del Nilo crudo

en: European perch
bg: костур
ca: perca de riu
cs: okoun říční
da: Aborre
de: Flussbarsch
el: Πέρκα
es: perca europea
et: ahven
fi: ahven
fr: perche commune
ga: Peirse
hr: grgeč
hu: Csapósügér
it: Pesce persico
la: Perca fluviatilis
lt: Ešerys
lv: Asaris
nn: Åbor
pl: Okoń europejski
ro: biban european
ru: Речной окунь
sk: Ostriež zelenkastý
sl: Perca fluviatilis
sv: Abborre

en: raw European perch
fr: Perche crue
it: pesce persico europeo crudo

en: European seabass
ar: شبص أوروبي
az: Lavrak
bg: морски вълк
br: Draeneg
bs: Lubin
ca: llobarro
co: Ragnola
cs: mořčák evropský
cy: Draenogyn Mor
da: Havbars
de: Europäischer Wolfsbarsch
el: Λαβράκι
eo: Labrako
es: Llobarro
eu: Lupi
fa: ماهی خاردار اروپایی
fi: Meribassi
fr: bar commun
ga: Doingean mara
gl: Robaliza
he: לברק
hr: lubin
hu: farkassügér
io: Barsho
is: Evrópskur hafbarri
it: spigola
ja: ヨーロピアンシーバス
ka: ლავრაკი
kg: Kilondo
ky: Лаврак
la: Dicentrarchus Labrax
lt: Paprastasis vilkešeris
nl: Europese zeebaars
nn: havabbor
pl: Labraks
pt: robalo
ro: biban de mare european
ru: Лаврак
sk: Okúň branzino
sl: Brancin
sv: Havsabborre
tr: Bayağı levrek
uk: Лаврак
zh: 	歐洲鱸

en: Raw European seabass
fr: Bar commun cru, Loup cru
it: branzino europeo crudo

en: Raw wild European seabass
fr: Bar commun cru sauvage
it: branzino selvatico europeo crudo

en: striped bass
az: Zolaqlı lavrak
bg: раиран костур
ca: llobarro atlàntic ratllat
cs: mořčák pruhovaný
de: Felsenbarsch
fa: خارماهی نواری
fi: Juovabassi
fr: Bar rayé
he: בס מנומר
hr: prugasti bas
hu: csíkos sügér
it: v
ja: ストライプドバス
ko: 줄농어
ky: Таргыл лаврак
nl: Gestreepte zeebaars
nn: Stripet havabbor
pl: Skalnik prążkowany
pt: robalo riscado
ru: Полосатый лаврак
sv: Strimmig havsabborre
uk: Окунь смугастий
vi: Cá vược sọc
zh: 銀花鱸魚

en: Raw striped bass
fr: Bar rayé cru, Bar d'Amérique cru
it: branzino striato crudo

en: European sprat, sprat
af: sprot
ar: صابوغة أوروبية
be: eўрапейскі шпрот
bg: цаца
br: glizig
ca: amploia
cs: šprot obecný
da: brisling
de: europäische Sprotte, Sprott
eo: sproto
es: espadín
et: läänemere kilu
eu: ijito-sardina
fa: خمسی اروپایی
fi: kilohaili
fr: sprat, sprats
gl: trancho
hr: papalina
hy: Եվրոպական շպրոտ
io: sprato
it: spratto
ja: ヨーロピアンスプラット
la: Sprattus Sprattus
lt: šprotas
lv: brētliņa
nl: sprot
pl: szprot
pt: espadilha
ro: șprotul
ru: европейский шпрот
sh: papalina
sl: papalina, sprat
sv: skarpsill
tr: çaça
uk: шпрот європейський
zh: 黍鯡

en: Baltic sprat
fr: Sprats de la mer Baltique
hr: baltička papalina
it: spratto baltico
la: Sprattus sprattus balticus

en: European plaice, plaice
az: Dəniz kambalası
bg: европейска камбала
br: Plaisenn
ca: palaia anglesa
cs: platýs velký
cy: Lleden Goch
da: Rødspætte
de: Goldbutt, Goldbuttfilets, Scholle
eo: Plateso
es: Solla
et: Atlandi merilest
eu: Platuxa leun
fa: صاف‌ماهی اروپایی
fi: Punakampela
fr: carrelet, Plie, Filet de plie, filets de carrelet, Plie commune, Plie d'europe
ga: Leathóg Bhreac
gl: Solla
hr: iverak zlatopjeg
hu: Sima lepényhal
io: Pleuronekto
is: Skarkoli
it: platessa, filetti di passera
ja: プレイス
kk: Камбала
la: Pleuronectes platessa
lt: Jūrinė plekšnė
nb: rødspette
nl: schol
nn: Raudspette
oc: Carrelet
pl: Gładzica
ru: морская камбала
sh: Iverak zlatopjeg
sv: Rödspätta
uk: камбала європейська
zh: 鰈魚

en: Raw European plaice
fr: Carrelet crue, Plie cru
it: platessa europea cruda

en: flounder
ar: مفلطح
de: Flunder
eo: Flundro
fi: kampela
fr: flet
ga: Leadhbóg, leadhbóige
hr: iverak, Platichthys flesus
it: passera
nl: Bot
pl: Flądra
pt: Linguado
tl: Tatampal
tr: Bayağı pisi balığı